North Carolina statutes. Chapter 120. General Assembly.
Article 30. Joint Legislative Committee on Domestic Violence. [Repealed]

§§ 120-265 through 120-267.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-291, s. 1.4(b), effective June 24, 2011.

History.

S. 120-265; 2005-356, s. 1; repealed by 2011-291, s. 1.4(b), effective June 24, 2011. s. 120-266; 2005-356, s. 1; repealed by 2011-291, s. 1.4(b), effective June 24, 2011. s. 120-267; 2005-356, s. 1; repealed by 2011-291, s. 1.4(b), effective June 24, 2011.

§§ 120-268,
120-269.

Reserved for future codification purposes.